District of Columbia statutes.
47-305.01

Revenue from public rights-of-way included in budget submission.

(a)

All of the revenue derived from the collection of charges imposed for rental and utilization of public rights-of-way authorized by [subchapter III of Chapter 11 of Title 10, § 10-1141.01 et seq.], shall be dedicated annually to the Local Transportation Fund.

(b)

Revenue derived from the collection of charges imposed for rental and utilization of public rights-of-way authorized by [subchapter III of Chapter 11 of Title 10, § 10-1141.01 et seq.], may be transferred annually to the District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund in an amount sufficient to meet the local contribution to match the federal entitlement grant.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 505, 47 DCR 6308
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 625(a), 58 DCR 1008
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7252, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-370 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“(a) The Mayor’s submission of proposed budgets to the Council beginning with the budget for fiscal year 2002 shall provide for all of the revenue derived from the collection of public rights-of-way occupancy fees to be dedicated to the District of Columbia Highway Trust fund and shall provide for any necessary adjustments to keep in balance the financial plan.
“(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not be applicable to the extent that FY 2002 General Fund revenues are inadequate and revenues do not exceed projections as certified in conjunction with the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Request Act. In this event, the Mayor shall include a detailed explanation with his submission of the FY 2002 budget to the Council.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “public rights-of-way authorized by Title VI of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996, effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-198; D.C. Official Code § 10-1141.01 et seq.)” for “public space authorized by the District of Columbia Public Space Rental Act, approved October 17, 1968 (82 Stat. 1156; D.C. Official Code § 10-1101 et seq.)” in (a); and substituted “public rights-of-way authorized by Title VI of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996, effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-198; D.C. Official Code § 10-1141.01 et seq.)” for “public space authorized by the District of Columbia Public Space Rental Act, approved October 17, 1968 (82 Stat. 1156; D.C. Official Code § 10-1101 et seq.)” in (b).

Temporary Legislation

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-97 repealed this section.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 19-97 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 625(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2 of District Department of Transportation Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-254, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11215).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7222 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”